Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1424
Commission; executive director; appointment; qualifications; compensation; removal; hearing.

The Governor shall appoint and set the salary of the executive director consistent with any compensation and pay plan established by the personnel division of the Department of Administrative Services. The executive director shall be qualified for the position by appropriate training and experience in the field of criminal law and justice. The executive director may be removed only for cause by the Governor after a hearing, if requested.

Laws 1969, c. 774, § 10, p. 2935;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 14, § 29.